Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5503
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Invest Nebraska Act, the definitions found in sections 77-5504 to 77-5530 shall be used.

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 3.